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DTC B0 108/52 Short in P Squib Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the front passenger airbag assembly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B0108/52 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0108/52
SShort inPsquibcircuit (toB+)
SPsquibmalfunction
SAirbagsensorassemblymalfunction

SFrontpassengerairbagassembly (Psquib)
SAirbagsensorassembly
SDashwire

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−473.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2 Check dash wire (P squib circuit).

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebattery,andwait
at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a)Turn the ignitionswitch toON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and P+ of

the dash wire connector on the front passenger airbag as-
sembly (P squib) side.

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace dash wire.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(d) Using a service wire, connect P+ and P− of the dash wire

connector on the front passenger airbag assembly (P
squib) side.

(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 108/52 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0108/52 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check P squib.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)

connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB0 108/52 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0108/52 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace front passenger airbag assembly
(P squib).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


